Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2517
Entitlement not created; funding.

The Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Act is not intended to create an entitlement to any activities described in the act, and the Department of Health and Human Services may perform the activities described in the act to the extent funds are available.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 631.